Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Distilled Spirits and Wine

244.210.
Nonbeverage alcohol not to be sold for beverage purposes.

No person shall knowingly sell any alcoholic product intended for nonbeverage purposes under KRS

243.320

, under circumstances from which he or she might reasonably deduce the intention of the purchaser to use it for beverage purposes.

History.

2554b-193: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 87, effective June 25, 2013.

244.220.
Regulations of special licenses to be prescribed by board.

The prohibitions, restrictions and regulations relating to special licenses shall be those which the board may by its regulations and in the exercise of its sound discretion prescribe. For purposes of this section, a special license shall be one that is not set forth in KRS Chapters 241 to 244.

History.

2554b-191; 2021 ch. 13, § 14, effective March 12, 2021.

244.230.
Federal regulations adopted relating to labeling and standards of fill — Labeling when manufactured outside country.

The regulations of the Bureau of Internal Revenue in the United States Department of the Treasury, with respect to the labeling and standards of fill of distilled spirits and wine in their original sealed packages, are adopted and any distilled spirits and wine shall be deemed to be properly labeled under all the laws of this state, if the labels and standards of fill conform to those regulations.

Distilled spirits not produced or bottled in the United States shall be labeled in the same manner that distilled spirits produced or bottled in this state are required to be labeled.

Subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not prevent the department from promulgating administrative regulations on this subject that are in addition to but not contrary to the regulations of the Bureau of Internal Revenue in the United States Department of the Treasury.

HISTORY:

2554b-170: amend. Acts 2004, ch. 123, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 594, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 62, § 102, effective June 29, 2017.

244.235.
“Kentucky” wine — Minimum requirements for use of Kentucky products.

No wine sold in Kentucky shall contain on its label or elsewhere on the wine’s retail container or package the word “Kentucky” or any other word or phrase implying that the origin of the wine is Kentucky, except in the name and address of the winery as required by federal laws or regulations, unless seventy-five percent (75%) of all grapes, grape juice, other fruits, other fruit juices, and honey used in making the wine were produced in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 179, § 14, effective January 1, 2007.

244.240.
Distiller, rectifier, winery, or wholesaler not to be interested in retail premises — Transactions prohibited — Discounts in the usual course of business — Retailer not to demand violation of this section — Permitted activities.

No distiller, rectifier, winery, or wholesaler and no employee, servant, or agent of a distiller, rectifier, winery, or wholesaler shall:

Except as provided in KRS

243.0305

and

243.155

, be interested directly or indirectly in any way in any premises where distilled spirits or wine is sold at retail or in any business devoted wholly or partially to the sale of distilled spirits or wine at retail;

Make or cause to be made any loan to any person engaged in the manufacture or sale of distilled spirits or wine at wholesale or retail;

Make any gift or render any kind of service whatsoever, directly or indirectly, to any licensee that may tend to influence the licensee to purchase the product of the distiller, rectifier, winery, or wholesaler; or

Enter into a contract with any retail licensee under which the licensee agrees to confine the licensee’s sales to distilled spirits or wine manufactured or sold by one (1) or more distillers, rectifiers, wineries, or wholesalers. This type of contract shall be void.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the giving of discounts in the usual course of business if the same discounts are offered to all licensees holding the same license type buying similar quantities.

A retailer shall not require or demand that a distiller, rectifier, winery, or wholesaler violate this section.

This section shall not prohibit a distiller from:

Supplying a retailer with barrels for the purpose of holding barrel-aged and batched cocktails; and

Selling private selection packages as authorized in KRS 243.0305(4)(a)3.

History.

2551b-168: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 88, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 80, § 24, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 103, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 164, § 8, effective April 13, 2018; 2022 ch. 39, § 12, effective March 29, 2022.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An employee of a beer distributor who is the joint survivorship owner with his wife of real property where she, as licensee, operates a saloon and package liquor store, but who is not an employee of his wife as licensee, is not prohibited by Regulation 804 KAR 5:020 from going upon the premises to make repairs, paint or for some other lawful purpose.

OAG 75-623

.

244.245.
Contract requirements — Pricing — Filing requirements — Penalties. [Repealed.]

244.250.
Producer or wholesaler not to furnish sign to licensee except under administrative regulations.

No distiller, rectifier, winery, or wholesaler shall furnish or cause to be furnished to any licensee any exterior or interior sign, printed, painted, electric or otherwise, except as authorized by the administrative regulations of the board.

History.

2554b-171: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 89, effective June 25, 2013.

244.260.
Containers that wholesaler may purchase, keep, or sell in — Distilled spirits or wine to be kept by licensees in approved containers.

No wholesaler shall purchase, import, keep upon the licensed premises, or sell any distilled spirits or wine in any container except in the original sealed package containing quantities of not less than fifty (50) milliliters each of distilled spirits or one hundred (100) milliliters of wine, and not exceeding the largest applicable federal standard of fill size for distilled spirits or two hundred twenty (220) liters of wine, as received from the distiller, rectifier, winery, or wholesaler. The containers shall be in sizes authorized by federal law and at all times shall have affixed to them all labels required by federal law or the administrative regulations of the board.

Except for purposes of preparing barrel-aged and batched cocktails as defined in KRS

241.010

and as permitted by KRS

243.055

and 243.082(4) and subsection (3) of this section, licensees holding retail distilled spirits and wine drink licenses shall not keep upon their licensed premises any distilled spirits or wine in any container except in the original package as received from the wholesaler and authorized by federal law. Containers of distilled spirits shall not exceed the largest applicable federal standard of fill size for distilled spirits or be less than fifty (50) milliliters of distilled spirits. Containers of wine shall not exceed two hundred twenty (220) liters or be less than one hundred (100) milliliters. All containers shall at all times have affixed to them any labels required by federal law or administrative regulations of the board.

Licensees holding retail distilled spirits and wine package licenses shall not keep upon their licensed premises any distilled spirits or wine in any container except in the original package as received from the wholesaler and authorized by federal law. Containers of distilled spirits shall not exceed the largest applicable federal standard of fill size for distilled spirits or be less than fifty (50) milliliters of distilled spirits. Containers of wine shall not exceed two hundred twenty (220) liters or be less than one hundred (100) milliliters. Except as permitted by subsection (2) of this section, all containers shall at all times remain sealed and shall have affixed to them any labels required by federal law or administrative regulations of the board.

History.

2554b-172: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 22, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 228, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 121, § 30, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 289, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2013, ch. 121, § 90, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 104, effective June 29, 2017; 2022 ch. 39, § 13, effective March 29, 2022.

244.270.
Wholesaler to have name and license number on window or building.

Each wholesaler shall have painted on the front window of the licensed premises, or, if there is no window, on a sign affixed to the front of the building containing the licensed premises, the name of the licensee together with the inscription: “Kentucky Wholesaler’s Liquor License No.
. . . . . ” in uniform letters not less than three (3) inches in height.

History.

2554b-173: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 121, § 31, effective July 15, 1998.

244.280.
Peddling prohibited.

No licensee nor any of the licensee’s agents, servants, or employees shall peddle any alcoholic beverages from house to house, by any means, where the sale is solicited at the residence or place of business of the consumer.

HISTORY:

2554b-158: amend. Acts 2000, ch. 289, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2017 ch. 62, § 105, effective June 29, 2017.

244.290.
Sales of distilled spirits or wine when polls are open permitted in wet or moist territory — Power of local governments to regulate — Sunday sales.

A licensee authorized to sell distilled spirits or wine at retail shall be permitted to sell and deliver distilled spirits and wine during the hours the polls are open on any primary, or regular, local option, or special election day unless it is located where the legislative body of a city, urban-county government, consolidated local government, charter county government, unified local government, or the fiscal court of a county adopts an ordinance after June 25, 2013, that prohibits the sale of distilled spirits and wine or limits the hours and times in which distilled spirits and wine may be sold within its jurisdictional boundaries on any primary, or regular, local option, or special election day during the hours the polls are open.

This subsection shall only apply in a wet or moist territory.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary, the fiscal court of a county shall not by ordinance or any other means:

Supersede, reverse, or modify any decision made pursuant to this subsection by the legislative body of a city within that county; or

Impose an action upon a city within that county when that city has taken no formal action pursuant to this subsection.

In any county containing a city of the first class, or a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census in which the sale of distilled spirits and wine by the drink is permitted under KRS Chapter 242, an election on the question of permitting the sale of distilled spirits and wine by the drink on Sunday may be held as provided in KRS Chapter 242.

Except as permitted by KRS

243.050

and subsection (4) of this section, a licensee authorized to sell distilled spirits or wine at retail shall not sell or deliver distilled spirits and wine between midnight and 6 a.m. or at any time during the twenty-four (24) hours of a Sunday.

A licensee authorized to sell distilled spirits and wine at retail may sell and deliver distilled spirits and wine on Sunday and during the hours and times as permitted by local ordinance of the legislative body of a city, urban-county government, consolidated local government, charter county government, unified local government, or the county with local jurisdiction. These ordinances shall not prohibit the sale, gift, or delivery of distilled spirits or wine between 6 a.m. and 12 midnight any day, except Sunday.

In any territory containing a licensed small farm winery that is permitted to sell alcoholic beverages under KRS Chapter 242, the sale of alcoholic beverages at the small farm winery on Sunday may be permitted if:

The legislative body of the local government having jurisdiction approves by local ordinance the sale of alcoholic beverages on Sunday in strict accordance with the sales permitted by KRS

243.155

on the licensed premises of a small farm winery during the hours and times as permitted in the local ordinance; or

A limited sale precinct election on the issue of Sunday sales is approved after meeting the requirements of KRS

242.1241

.

In any county containing a city of the first class or in any city located in that county in which the sale of distilled spirits and wine is permitted under KRS Chapter 242, the distilled spirits administrator may issue a license to holders of a quota retail drink license or a special private club license that permits the sale of distilled spirits and wine by the drink on Sunday from 1 p.m. until the prevailing time for that locality.

HISTORY:

2254b-179: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 168, § 7, 16; 2016 ch. 80, § 17, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 106, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 102, § 11, effective July 15, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

244.295.
Urban-county government may set liquor sale hours — Local option on Sunday sales in urban-county — Licensing — Sunday sales extension. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 340, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 522, § 22, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 99, § 11, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 125, § 10, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 121, § 92, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 23, effective July 15, 2014; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

244.300.
Extension of credit by retailers prohibited — Exceptions.

No retailer selling distilled spirits and wine by the package or by the drink shall sell, deliver, or give away, or cause, permit or procure to be sold, delivered, or given away any distilled spirits or wine on credit, except that a bona fide licensed private club, restaurant, or hotel may sell on reasonable credit to its members, customers, or registered guests. Sales by any retailer selling distilled spirits or wine by the package or by the drink may be made by use of national or bank credit cards wherein the credit card company has agreed to payment to the licensee for such charges. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a licensee to issue its own credit cards or extend a personal credit to patrons.

History.

2554b-182: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 23, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 313, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 89, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2013, ch. 121, § 93, effective June 25, 2013.

244.310.
Containers that drink retailer may keep upon premises. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

2554b-187: amend. Acts 1970, ch. 136, § 2; 1978, ch. 194, § 24, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 24, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

244.320.
Females to be served only at tables. [Repealed.]

244.330.
One bar allowed for each license — Service bars. [Repealed.]

244.340.
Containers that package retailer may purchase, keep, or sell in. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

2554b-184: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 25, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 228, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

244.350.
Package retailer not to deliver nor advertise delivery. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

2554b-186: amend. Acts 2000, ch. 435, § 16, effective July 14, 2000; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

244.360.
Alcoholic beverage retailer to have name and license number on window. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

2554b-185: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 522, § 23, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

244.370.
Whiskey to be aged — Exception if not labeled as Kentucky whiskey.

No whiskey produced from grains which are cooked, fermented, and distilled in Kentucky, except whiskey the barrel containing which is branded “Corn Whiskey” under the internal revenue laws, shall be bottled in Kentucky or removed from this state unless such whiskey has been aged in oak barrels for a period of not less than one (1) full year; provided, however, that whiskey aged less than one (1) year may be removed from the state and bottled, or bottled in Kentucky, if the word “Kentucky” or any word or phrase implying Kentucky origin does not appear on the front label or elsewhere on the retail container or package except in the name and address of the distiller as required by federal regulation. For violations of this section, the department shall revoke the permit of the licensee from whose warehouse or premises such whiskey shall have been removed or in which such whiskey shall have been bottled.

HISTORY:

2554b-169: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 183, §§ 1, 2; 1970, ch. 11; 2010, ch. 24, § 595, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 59, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section does not prohibit the aging, bottling and labeling of “light whiskey” in Kentucky which is done in strict compliance with applicable federal regulations.

OAG 68-242

.

244.380.
Provisions contracts of sale to contain (fair trade contracts). [Repealed.]

244.390.
Minimum resale prices. [Repealed.]

244.400.
Contracts of producers and processors — Filing — Contents. [Repealed.]

244.410.
Contracts of wholesalers — Filing — Contents. [Repealed.]

244.420.
Nonresident producers and importers to sell under fair trade contract. [Repealed.]

244.430.
Amendments to fair trade contracts may be filed. [Repealed.]

244.440.
Registration of wholesalers authorized to handle particular brands — and product names.

Every resident and nonresident distiller, rectifier, or winery and nonresident wholesaler who owns, is the primary source of supply, or has an exclusive interest in any particular brands, which are intended for sale or sold in this state, shall be licensed in this state and shall register on a form to be provided by the department, the names of the wholesalers in this state to whom distributing rights have been granted for one or more or all of the brands and product names of distilled spirits or wine offered for sale or sold in this state.

No distiller, rectifier, or winery shall offer to sell or sell, and no wholesaler shall offer to purchase or purchase, any brands and product names that have not been registered as provided by this section.

HISTORY:

2554e-8, 2554e-9; 2010, ch. 24, § 596, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 94, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 107, effective June 29, 2017.

244.450.
Wholesaler not to act until receipt of license and distribution rights and after filing brand registration form with department.

No licensed wholesaler shall import, buy, offer for sale, or sell any brands offered for sale or sold by any out-of-state distiller, rectifier, winery, supplier, or wholesaler without:

Having previously been granted distributing rights by a licensed out-of-state distiller, rectifier, winery, supplier, or wholesaler; and

Having previously filed with the department a brand registration form signed by the licensed out-of-state distiller, rectifier, winery, supplier, or wholesaler.

No wholesaler shall file or register a brand belonging to an out-of-state distiller, rectifier, winery, supplier, or wholesaler until the out-of-state distiller, rectifier, winery, supplier, or wholesaler becomes licensed and has granted distributing rights to the wholesaler.

History.

2554e-9; 2010, ch. 24, § 597, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 95, effective June 25, 2013.

244.460.
Close-out sales — Requirements of. [Repealed.]

244.461.
Use of rebate coupons — Redemption — Retailers’ loyalty cards.

Manufacturers and importers of malt beverages, distilled spirits, and wine may advertise and promote, by specific brand and bottle size, malt beverages, distilled spirits, and wine for off-premises consumption by use of rebate coupons.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, rebate coupons are redeemable by the consumer at the point of purchase, or by mail-in certificate by which the consumer receives a cash refund or nonalcoholic beverage merchandise from the manufacturer, importer, or clearinghouse acting for the manufacturer or importer, upon submission by the consumer of the required proof of purchase.

Rebate coupons on malt beverages that are redeemable by the consumer at the point of purchase are prohibited. Manufacturers and importers of malt beverages may provide rebate coupons that are redeemable by mail-in certificate by which the consumer receives a cash refund or nonalcoholic beverage merchandise from the manufacturer, importer, or clearinghouse acting for the manufacturer or importer, upon submission by the consumer of the required proof of purchase. Redemption of permitted rebate coupons on malt beverages shall be funded solely by manufacturers and importers of malt beverages.

Unless prohibited by KRS

244.050

, loyalty cards issued by retailers that reward customers with product discounts for buying goods or services shall not be prohibited by this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 289, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2017 ch. 62, § 108, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 102, § 13, effective July 15, 2020.

244.470.
Violators guilty of unfair competition. [Repealed.]